Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 3

Parental Consent for Abortions by Minors

37-10-301. Legislative intent and findings.

It is the intent of the general assembly in enacting this parental consent provision to further the important and compelling state interests of:

Protecting minors against their own immaturity;

Fostering the family structure and preserving it as a viable social unit; and

Protecting the rights of parents to rear children who are members of their household.

The general assembly finds as fact that:

Immature minors often lack the ability to make fully informed choices that take into account of both immediate and long-range consequences;

The medical, emotional, and psychological consequences of abortion are serious and can be lasting, particularly when the patient is immature;

The capacity to become pregnant and the capacity for mature judgment concerning the wisdom of an abortion are not necessarily related;

Parents ordinarily possess information essential to a physician's exercise of the physician's best medical judgment concerning the child; and

Parents who are aware that their minor daughter has had an abortion may better ensure that their daughter receives adequate medical attention after the abortion.

The general assembly further finds that parental consultation is usually desirable and in the best interests of the minor.

Acts 1988, ch. 929, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2 provided for the revival, reenactment and placing in full effect the provisions of §§37-10-301 —37-10-307, which require parental consent to perform an abortion on a minor.

Cross-References. Abortion, title 39, ch. 15, part 2.

Ambulatory surgical care centers terminating pregnancies, licensing, §68-11-223.

Child Rape Protection Act of 2006, §39-15-210.

Public school nurse program, title 68, ch. 1, part 12.

Law Reviews.

Assisting Minors Seeking Abortions in Judicial Bypass Proceedings: A Guardian ad Litem Is No Substitute for an Attorney, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 581 (2002).

Attorney General Opinions. Health of the mother exception, defining gestation, OAG 97-062 (5/5/97).

Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).

Collateral References.

Women's Reproductive Rights Concerning Abortion, and Governmental Regulation Thereof — Supreme Court Cases. 20 A.L.R. Fed. 2d 1.

Validity, construction, and application of statutes requiring parental notification of or consent to minor's abortion. 77 A.L.R.5th 1.

37-10-302. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abortion” means the use of any instrument, medicine, drug, or any other substance or device with intent to terminate the pregnancy of a woman known to be pregnant with intent other than to increase the probability of a live birth, to preserve the life or health of the child after live birth, or to remove a dead fetus;

“Emancipated minor” means any minor who is or has been married or has by court order or otherwise been freed from the care, custody and control of the minor's parents; and

“Minor” means any person under eighteen (18) years of age.

Acts 1988, ch. 929, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2 provided for the revival, reenactment and placing in full effect the provisions of §§37-10-301 —37-10-307, which require parental consent to perform an abortion on a minor.

Cross-References. Abortion, title 39, ch. 15, part 2.

Attorney General Opinions. The use of RU-486 can, depending on when the drug is administered to a given individual, fall under the definition of an “abortion” under T.C.A. §37-10-302(a)(1); if the drug is administered before implantation of the embryo in the uterine wall, the drug is a contraceptive, but if the drug is administered after implantation of the embryo in the uterine wall, the drug serves to cause an abortion, OAG 01-30 (3/7/01).

Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).

37-10-303. Written consent required — Petition for waiver.

No person shall perform an abortion on an unemancipated minor unless such person or such person's agent first obtains the written consent of one (1) parent or the legal guardian of the minor. The consent shall be signed. The person shall obtain some written documentation, other than the written consent itself, that purports to establish the relationship of the parent or guardian to the minor and the documentation, along with the signed consent, shall be retained by the person for a period of at least one (1) year. Failure of the person performing the abortion to obtain or retain the documentation and consent is a Class B misdemeanor, punishable only by a fine, unless the failure of the person performing the abortion to retain the required documentation was due to a bona fide, imminent medical emergency to the minor, in which case there is no violation.

A person commits a Class A misdemeanor who impersonates the parent or legal guardian of an unemancipated minor for the purpose of circumventing the requirements of subdivision (a)(1).

If neither a parent nor a legal guardian is available to the person performing the abortion or such person's agent, or the party from whom consent must be obtained pursuant to this section refuses to consent to the performance of an abortion, or the minor elects not to seek consent of the parent or legal guardian whose consent is required, then the minor may petition, on the minor's own behalf, or by next friend, the juvenile court of any county of this state for a waiver of the consent requirement of this section, pursuant to the procedures of § 37-10-304.

If a criminal charge of incest is pending against a parent of such minor pursuant to § 39-15-302, the written consent of such parent, as provided for in subdivision (a)(1), is not required.

Acts 1988, ch. 929, § 3; 1995, ch. 458, § 3; 2006, ch. 932, §§ 1, 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2 provided for the revival, reenactment and placing in full effect the provisions of §§37-10-301 —37-10-307, which require parental consent to perform an abortion on a minor.

Cross-References. Abortion, title 39, ch. 15, part 2.

Penalties for Class A and B misdemeanors, §40-35-111.

Research and experimentation upon aborted fetuses, consent of mother required, §39-15-208.

Law Reviews.

Assisting Minors Seeking Abortions in Judicial Bypass Proceedings: A Guardian ad Litem Is No Substitute for an Attorney, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 581 (2002).

The Lawyer's Moval Autonomy & Formal Opinion 140 (Ernest F. Lidge III), 33 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 12 (1997).

Attorney General Opinions. Residency and venue requirements, OAG 96-053 (3/26/96).

Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).

Disciplinary Board Opinions.

Court-appointed attorneys for minors seeking abortions via judicial bypass of parental consent did not commit ethical violations, where such procedure had not been found unconstitutional. Formal Ethics Opinion 96-F-140 (6/13/96).

37-10-304. Applicability — Pseudonym — Counsel — Court proceedings — Appeals.

The requirements and procedures under this part are available and apply to minors, whether or not they are residents of this state.

The court shall ensure that the minor's identity is kept anonymous. The minor shall be allowed to proceed under a pseudonym and shall be allowed to sign all documents, including the petition, by that pseudonym. In any proceedings involving the use of a pseudonym by the minor, the court shall require one (1) copy of the petition to be filed, under seal, that contains the true name of the minor. This copy of the petition shall be kept in a separate file, under seal, and shall not be available for inspection by anyone, except as provided in subsection (h).

The minor may participate in proceedings in the court on the minor's own behalf or through a next friend. The court shall advise the minor that the minor has a right to court-appointed counsel and shall provide the minor with such counsel upon the minor's request. The state shall further provide a court-appointed advocate in each judicial district to give information regarding the legal process to the minor and to coordinate with the court-appointed counsel. Such court-appointed advocates shall be compensated from funds appropriated for the reimbursement of court-appointed counsel.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Court proceedings under this section shall be given such precedence over other pending matters as is necessary to ensure that the court may reach a decision promptly, but in no case shall the court fail to rule within forty-eight (48) hours of the time of application; provided, that the forty-eight-hour limitation may be extended at the request of the minor. If, for any reason except the request of the minor, the court shall not have ruled within forty-eight (48) hours, the minor may deem the petition denied and immediately appeal the denial as provided in subsection (g). This provision is not deemed to restrict or forbid any other remedy now existing or hereafter enacted in such a situation.

The consent requirement shall be waived if the court finds either that:

The minor is mature and well-informed enough to make the abortion decision on the minor's own; or

The performance of the abortion would be in the minor's best interests.

A court that conducts proceedings under this section shall issue written and specific factual findings and legal conclusions supporting its decision and shall order that a confidential record of the evidence be maintained.

An expedited, anonymous appeal shall be available to any minor. The appeal shall be de novo to the circuit court for the county in which the juvenile court is located. The appeal may be heard by the circuit court judge sitting in another county if necessary to meet the time limitations of this section. A notice of appeal shall be filed within twenty-four (24) hours of the decision by the juvenile court, but may be filed at any time, if the juvenile court has not ruled within forty-eight (48) hours of the filing of the petition. The record from the juvenile court must be received in the circuit court and the appeal docketed there within five (5) calendar days of the filing of the notice of appeal. The appeal shall be heard and a decision rendered by the circuit court within five (5) calendar days from when the case is docketed in the circuit court. For the purpose of expediting the appellate procedure under this section, the time requirements of this section may be reduced by the Tennessee supreme court pursuant to its rulemaking authority in order to ensure an expedited appeal. The decision of the circuit court shall be appealable to the Tennessee supreme court in an anonymous and expedited manner as provided by the rules of the Tennessee supreme court. Jurisdiction under this section will remain in the Tennessee supreme court, notwithstanding any other statute or rule to the contrary.

All court files, documents, exhibits, and all other records lodged in or subject to the control of the court shall be kept confidential and under seal. Statistical summaries of these proceedings may be compiled for such reporting purposes as the supreme court may by rule require or allow. However, no information shall be released for these purposes that would tend to identify any minor who has made use of this procedure.

The supreme court is respectfully requested to promulgate any rules necessary to ensure that proceedings under this part are handled in an expeditious and anonymous manner, including any amendments to the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure, Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure and Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

No fees shall be required of any minor who makes use of the procedures provided by this section.

Acts 1988, ch. 929, § 4; 1989, ch. 412, § 1; 2020, ch. 764, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2 provided for the revival, reenactment and placing in full effect the provisions of §§37-10-301 —37-10-307, which require parental consent to perform an abortion on a minor.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted (c)(2) which read: “The department of children's services shall assign from existing staff at least one (1) court advocate in each judicial district to provide minors with information regarding requirements and procedures established by the provisions of this part, to assist in coordination of the activities of court-appointed counsel, to attend legal proceedings with the minor or the minor's next friend, and to make available written material concerning the provisions and applications of this part. The advocate shall be trained in the juvenile court procedures, in the procedures established by this part, and in counseling minors. The department shall provide a toll-free telephone number for minors to use in order to obtain the telephone number and address of a court advocate. The department shall further provide and distribute a written brochure or information sheet that summarizes the provisions and applications of this part and that contains the toll-free telephone number as well as the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the court advocates in each judicial district.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 764, § 4. July 13, 2020.

Cross-References. Abortion, title 39, ch. 15, part 2.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Expedited appeals of denial of consent for abortion, Tenn. R. Sup. Ct. 24.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rules 13 and 24 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 27 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Law Reviews.

Assisting Minors Seeking Abortions in Judicial Bypass Proceedings: A Guardian ad Litem Is No Substitute for an Attorney, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 581 (2002).

Disciplinary Board Opinions.

Court-appointed attorneys for minors seeking abortions via judicial bypass of parental consent serves not as guardian ad litem but as advocate for the minor; such counsel must not fail to seek the minor's lawful objective, and has a duty of undivided loyalty to the minor. Formal Ethics Opinion 96-F-140 (6/13/96).

Attorney General Opinions. Interpretation of various aspects of judicial bypass, OAG 96-053 (3/26/96).

Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).

37-10-305. Medical emergencies.

The requirements of §37-10-303 shall not apply when, in the best medical judgment of the physician based on the facts of the case before the physician, a medical emergency exists that so complicates the pregnancy as to require an immediate abortion.

Acts 1988, ch. 929, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2 provided for the revival, reenactment and placing in full effect the provisions of §§37-10-301 —37-10-307, which require parental consent to perform an abortion on a minor.

Attorney General Opinions. Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).

37-10-306. Violations.

Any person who intentionally performs an abortion with knowledge that, or with reckless disregard as to whether the person upon whom the abortion is to be performed is an unemancipated minor, and who intentionally or knowingly fails to conform to any requirement of this part, commits a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1988, ch. 929, § 6; 1989, ch. 591, §§ 1, 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The misdemeanor in this section has been designated as a Class A misdemeanor by authority of §40-35-110, which provides that an offense designated a misdemeanor without specification as to category is a Class A misdemeanor. See also §39-11-114.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2 provided for the revival, reenactment and placing in full effect the provisions of §§37-10-301 —37-10-307, which require parental consent to perform an abortion on a minor.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).

37-10-307. Civil actions.

Failure to obtain consent pursuant to the requirements of this part is prima facie evidence of failure to obtain informed consent and of interference with family relations in appropriate civil actions. The law of this state shall not be construed to preclude the award of exemplary damages in any appropriate civil action relevant to violations of this part. Nothing in this part shall be construed to limit the common law rights of parents.

In addition to the action provided for in subsection (a), a person or entity that fails to comply with the notice requirements of § 39-15-202(a)(2) [See Compiler's Notes] shall be subject to the penalties and action provided for in § 39-15-202(a)(3) [See Compiler's Notes].

Acts 1988, ch. 929, § 7; 2010, ch. 790, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 790, § 1 provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as the “Freedom From Coercion Act.”

Acts 1995, ch. 458, §§ 1, 2 provided for the revival, reenactment and placing in full effect the provisions of §§37-10-301 —37-10-307, which require parental consent to perform an abortion on a minor.

Section39-15-202, referred to in (b), was rewritten by Acts 2015, ch. 473, § 1, effective July 1, 2015. Current provisions relating to the notice requirements and penalties formerly found in subdivisions (a)(2) and (a)(3) may now be found in § 39-15-202(i).

Cross-References. Research, photography, sale and experimentation on aborted fetuses, consent of mother required, §39-15-208.

Law Reviews.

Assisting Minors Seeking Abortions in Judicial Bypass Proceedings: A Guardian ad Litem Is No Substitute for an Attorney, 55 Vand. L. Rev. 581 (2002).

Disciplinary Board Opinions.

Right of attorney appointed on behalf of minor seeking abortion via judicial bypass procedure to decline the appointment for moral, religious or malpractice insurance reasons. Formal Ethics Opinion 96-F-140 (6/13/96).

Attorney General Opinions. Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).

37-10-308. Severability.

If any one (1) or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is found to be unconstitutional, the same is declared to be severable and the balance of this part shall remain effective notwithstanding the unconstitutionality. The legislature declares that it would have passed this part, and each provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one (1) or more provision, section, subsection, sentence, clause, phrase or word be declared unconstitutional.

Acts 2006, ch. 932, § 2.

Attorney General Opinions. Imposing a mandatory parental consent requirement upon a pregnant minor’s ability to obtain an abortion, without allowing a judicial by-pass procedure, would be unconstitutional, OAG 04-055 (3/30/2004).